Utah statutes.
17D-2-507.   Required provision in device securing payment of bonds.
Each mortgage, trust deed, security agreement, trust indenture, or other
security device securing payment of bonds issued under this part shall provide
that no deficiency judgment upon foreclosure may be entered against:
(1)  the local building authority;
(2)  the state; or
(3)  any political subdivision of the state.
